California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
This division shall not apply to the proceedings of the legislative body of any entity in granting to the legislative body of another entity the power and authority to exercise extraterritorial jurisdiction within its boundaries. However, the legislative body of the entity granted such power and authority shall comply with this division as to all property proposed to be assessed or with such provisions of Part 1 hereof as may be applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1595.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. INVESTIGATION AND REPORT ON THE PROJECT [2820. - 2830.]

2820.

Before any ordinance or resolution may be adopted by the legislative body of any county, city, district or other public corporation, ordering the construction of any public improvement or the acquisition of any property for public use where the cost of such construction or acquisition is to be paid in whole or in part by special assessments or through special assessment taxes upon lands, the proceedings required by this division shall be taken.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1949, Ch. 856.)
-------------------------------------------

2821.

The legislative body shall by resolution or ordinance determine in general the nature, location and extent of such proposed improvement or acquisition. Reference may be made to one or more plans, specifications or plats for such descriptions and for all particulars relative thereto, which plans, specifications or plats shall be on file with the clerk of the legislative body and open to inspection.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2822.

The legislative body shall also generally define the boundaries or extent of the district or lands to be specially assessed to pay all or any part of the cost of the proposed improvement or acquisition.

The district may be described by:

(a) Stating the exterior boundaries thereof, or

(b) Giving a description thereof according to any official or recorded map or maps, or

(c) Referring to a plat or map on file in the office of the clerk of the legislative body which shall indicate by a boundary line the territory to be included in the assessment district, and which shall govern for all details as to the extent of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2823.

The legislative body shall also determine the amount or percentage, if any, proposed to be paid toward the cost of such improvement or acquisition from any source other than special assessments upon benefited property, and shall determine the law under which the proceedings are to be conducted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2824.

The legislative body shall cause a written report upon the proposed improvement or acquisition to be prepared for it. The legislative body of a county may require the county surveyor or the county road commissioner to procure the required information and prepare the report, and the legislative body of a city may require the city engineer or the superintendent of streets to procure the required information and prepare the report. In lieu of the county surveyor, county road commissioner, city engineer or superintendent of streets, the legislative body of the city or county may employ any competent person to procure such information and prepare the report. The person required to prepare the report shall complete and file the same with the legislative body within one year from the date such person is directed to prepare the report.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1324.)
-------------------------------------------

2825.

The report on the proposed improvement or acquisition shall contain all of the following information:

(a) A map, plat, or diagram showing the general nature, location, and extent of the proposed improvement or acquisition and the lands to be assessed to pay any part of the cost thereof.

(b) The total estimated cost of the proposed improvement, stating separately the estimated cost of each class of construction proposed, such as grading, paving, curbing, and the like, and including the incidental expenses of the proceedings, the total amount of which shall also be separately stated, as well as any cost of registering bonds.

(c) The total estimated cost, including the incidental expenses of the proceedings and any cost of registering bonds, the total amount of which shall also be separately stated, of the proposed acquisition.

If the acquisition of property for more than one purpose is involved, and any of the purposes will require the acquisition of property or rights in property for which compensation is required to be made, which property or rights would not be required if that purpose were omitted, the estimated cost of the property or rights acquired for that purpose shall be separately stated.

(d) The true value of the parcels to be assessed calculated in accordance with Part 8 (commencing with Section 2980).

(e) The true value of each parcel to be assessed calculated in accordance with Part 8 (commencing with Section 2980).

(f) The amount, as near as may be determined, of the total principal sum of all unpaid special assessments and special assessments required or proposed to be levied under any completed or pending assessment proceedings, other than that contemplated in the instant proceedings, whether direct or ad valorem, upon each parcel proposed to be assessed, which would require an investigation and report under this division.

(g) The estimated amount of the assessment for the proposed acquisition or improvement to be levied upon each parcel to be assessed. If the district is to be divided into zones, the proposed zones and the percentage to be assessed against each zone shall be shown on the district map and the estimated assessment shall be proportioned, as nearly as may be, according to the zones and percentages.

(h) The number of years within which the bonds, if any, to be issued shall mature, and the number of installments of the principal of the bonds, and the interest rate or maximum interest rate at which the bonds shall be issued if no definite interest rate is to be fixed until the bonds are sold.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1298, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

2826.

A copy of the resolution or ordinance adopted pursuant to Section 2821 shall be attached to the report.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2827.

The assessments required to be set forth in the report shall be deemed to be estimates only and the final assessments levied under any street improvement law may differ therefrom in amount. The final assessments shall be subject to the limitations imposed by this division and shall be levied in accordance with the street improvement law designated and shall be subject to objection only in the manner provided in that street improvement law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2828.

The person preparing the report shall appear at the hearing on the report and give all information concerning it to all interested property owners and to the legislative body.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2829.

The legislative body may by order or resolution abandon the proposed acquisition or improvement during the preparation of the report or at any time thereafter until, but not after, the award of contract for the acquisition or improvement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2830.

When the report has been approved by the legislative body, the fact and date of such approval shall be indorsed thereon, and the report shall be filed with the clerk of the legislative body.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3. HEARING UPON THE REPORT [2850. - 2859.]

2850.

The legislative body shall fix a time and place of hearing on the approved report and may order the hearing to be held by the legislative body or by other public officers or public board of the city or county governed by the legislative body as may be designated by it. The public officers or public board shall serve without additional compensation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1194, Sec. 5.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

2851.

The clerk of the legislative body shall give notice of the hearing by mailing a copy of the notice, postage prepaid, to all persons owning real property which is proposed to be assessed to pay any part of the cost of the work, whose names and addresses appear on the last equalized city or county assessment roll, as the case may be, available on the date the report is commenced, at his address as shown upon such roll or as known to the clerk.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1945, Ch. 1008.)
-------------------------------------------

2852.

The notice of the hearing on the report shall be substantially in the following form (filling in blanks):

Notice is hereby given that land owned by you or in which you are interested is proposed to be assessed for the proposed (here briefly state in general terms what is proposed to be done, such as paving X Street between A Street and B Street). The estimated cost of the ____ (acquisition or improvement) is $____; the assessed value of the real property within the district is $____; the estimated true value of parcels within the district is $____; the estimated total amount of assessments upon parcels to be assessed for acquisitions or improvements done or previously ordered is $____;
 the estimated amount of the proposed assessment upon your parcel for the proposed ____ (improvement or acquisition) is $____. The estimated amount of the proposed assessment is approximate only, is based upon the stated estimated cost, and is not to be deemed the actual amount which will be assessed. The amount of money to be contributed towards the project by the (City or County of ____) is the sum of $____.

A hearing will be held in the (place of hearing) by (designation of body or officer) on the ____ day of ____, 20__, at the hour of ___ o’clock _m. at which time and place all protests and objections will be heard. The proceeding for the acquisition or improvement is proposed to be conducted under the (here by short title or otherwise designate act under which the project will be undertaken).

A report
 on the proposed project is on file in the office of the clerk of the ____ (designate the legislative body) and is open to public inspection.Clerk of (name of legislative body)

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 198, Sec. 9.   (AB 3246)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

2853.

The notice of the hearing must be mailed at least 30 days prior to the date of the hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1194, Sec. 6.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

2854.

If any parcel of land is assessed as owner unknown on the assessment roll, no notice need be sent for such parcel unless the name and address of a person claiming an interest in such property has been filed with the clerk, in which case notice shall be mailed to such person and address.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2855.

In the absence of fraud no error or mistake in the mailing of the notices, or any of them, and no failure of any property owners to receive the same shall in any way affect the validity of the proceedings, but the clerk shall file his affidavit of mailing such notice, and such affidavit shall be conclusive evidence that the notices have been mailed as required by this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2856.

At the hearing protests may be made orally or in writing by any person who would be entitled to protest or object to the ordering of the things proposed to be done at a hearing on the resolution of intention. However, all written protests shall be filed with the clerk of the legislative body at or before the time fixed for the hearing, and any protest relating to the regularity or sufficiency of the proceedings shall be in writing and shall clearly set forth the irregularity or defect to which objection is made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2857.

At the hearing on the report, the report, except as to the map, plat or diagram and the assessed valuations and true valuations of and assessments and estimated assessments upon each parcel of land, shall be read or summarized before protests are considered. The hearing may be continued from time to time not exceeding 120 days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 700.)
-------------------------------------------

2858.

If the hearing on the report is not held before the legislative body, then within 10 days after the conclusion of the hearing, the persons conducting the hearing shall file a report on the hearing with the legislative body. The report on the hearing shall include a statement of the time when and place where the hearing was held, the approximate number of persons present, the number and nature of the protests made, and the recommendation of the persons holding the hearing. The report on the hearing shall be filed with the clerk of the legislative body.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2859.

Unless the acquisition or improvement is abandoned, the report and the report on the hearing, if the hearing is not held before the legislative body, shall be kept on file, open to public inspection, and any resolution of intention or ordinance of intention adopted in the proceeding under the improvement law shall state that such reports are on file with the clerk and may be examined at his office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4. ACTING UPON THE REPORT [2880. - 2885.]

2880.

If the hearing on the report is held before the legislative body, it may consider the report immediately after the hearing or at such time within 30 days as it may designate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2881.

If the hearing on the report is not held before the legislative body, then within 30 days after the report on the hearing has been filed, the report and the report on the hearing shall be considered and (except as to the map, plat or diagram and the assessed valuations and true valuations of and assessments and estimated assessments upon individual parcels of land) shall be read to the legislative body.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2882.

If the legislative body determines that the public interest, convenience and necessity require the acquisition or improvement substantially as set forth in the report and that the project is feasible, it may proceed under the law stated in the report as the statute under which the proceeding is to be conducted, except as otherwise provided in this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2883.

The acquisition or improvement shall be deemed substantially the same as set forth in the report if the things proposed to be done in the report are not so changed or modified as to increase the estimated cost by more than one-tenth of the total estimated cost as stated in the report and no changes exceeding said one-tenth shall be made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1945, Ch. 1008.)
-------------------------------------------

2884.

The legislative body may, without further notice or hearing, omit or decrease any portion of or make such alterations or changes in the work proposed to be done which will not increase the estimated cost by more than one-tenth of the total estimated cost as stated in the report and no changes or alterations which will increase said estimated cost by more than said one-tenth shall be made. The person who prepares the plans and specifications shall estimate separately the cost of each addition to or omission from or decrease in the things proposed to be done as set forth in the report, and file such estimate with the clerk of the legislative body. Such filed estimate shall be conclusive evidence of the cost of such changes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1949, Ch. 915.)
-------------------------------------------

2885.

At the hearing on the ordinance or resolution of intention, the reports (except as to the map, plat or diagram and the assessed valuations and true valuations of and the assessments and estimated assessments upon each parcel of land) shall be read or summarized to the legislative body prior to the consideration of protests and objections, if any. If the hearing on the ordinance or resolution of intention is held at the same time as the hearing on the report this section shall not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 700.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 5. DEBT LIMITATIONS [2900. - 2905.]

2900.

If the report on the proposed acquisition or improvement shows that the estimated amount proposed to be assessed upon any parcel for the proposed acquisition or improvement will exceed one-half of the true value of the parcel as set forth in the report, or shows that the total estimated cost of the proposed improvement or acquisition, less any amount to be paid towards the cost from any source other than special assessments upon the parcels benefited by the acquisition or improvement, when added to the aggregate totals of all unpaid assessments and estimated assessments, as the totals are stated in the report, will exceed in total amount one-half of the true value of all the parcels proposed to be assessed, the proposed proceeding shall be abandoned or modified so that the amount to be specially assessed for the cost of the acquisition or improvement will be less than the limits hereby established, unless the excess of the cost and indebtedness over one-half of the true value shall be paid from some source other than by special assessment on the parcels, or unless the limitation is overruled.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1298, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

2901.

If the total cost of any improvement, including incidental expenses but excluding the actual cost of the acquisition of any property, exceeds the total estimated cost including incidental expenses, as stated in the report and the separate estimate for changes, if any, in the things to be done as filed with the clerk, by more than one-tenth of such estimated cost, no part of the excess over said one-tenth shall be assessed upon the lands to be assessed in the proceeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2902.

If the total cost including incidental expenses of any acquisition or improvement, less any amount to be paid toward the cost from any source other than special assessment upon the parcels benefited thereby, when added to the aggregate totals of all assessments and estimated assessments as stated in the report, exceeds in total amount one-half of the total true value stated in the report of all the parcels to be assessed to pay any part of the cost of the acquisition or improvement, no part of the excess shall be assessed upon the parcels.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1298, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

2903.

If the estimated or actual cost including incidental expenses of any acquisition or improvement exceeds the amounts that may be specially assessed upon benefited property, the legislative body may provide for the payment of such excess cost from any available funds under its control and the balance shall then be specially assessed in accordance with the statute under which the proceeding is conducted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2904.

Whenever an improvement contract has been awarded, the county or city or district or other public corporation, the legislative body of which is conducting the proceeding, shall, if the actual cost of the improvement, including incidental expenses, exceeds the amount that may be specially assessed upon benefited property, pay such excess cost from the general or any fund available and the balance shall be specially assessed under the statute under which the proceeding is conducted.

If the property to be specially assessed is within the jurisdiction of more than one legislative body and consents to such proceeding have been given by all the legislative bodies having jurisdiction, any such legislative body whose consent has been so given may appropriate all or any part of such excess cost from any available funds under its control, and may pay the amount so appropriated into the treasury of the county or city or district or other public corporation whose legislative body has jurisdiction over the proceeding to be applied in payment of such excess.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1941, Ch. 1070.)
-------------------------------------------

2905.

Notwithstanding anything in this division, if the legislative body conducting the proceedings, after the report or reports provided for in this division have been filed and considered and prior to the adoption of the ordinance or resolution ordering the acquisition or improvement, finds by a four-fifths vote of all members thereof entered upon its minutes that the proposed project is feasible and that the lands to be assessed will be able to carry the burden of such proposed assessment, the limitations on the amounts of assessments provided for in this part may be disregarded, both with respect to the limitation on the district as a whole and as to the limitation on individual specific assessments. If the legislative body makes such a finding none of the limitations upon the amounts of assessments contained in this division shall thereafter apply to any assessment or assessment proceedings thereafter had or taken. However, if at the hearing on the report protests in writing are filed as provided in Section 2856 by the owners (as defined in the law under which the acquisition or improvement proceedings are to be taken) of a majority in area of the lands to be assessed, such limitations shall not be exceeded except as to proceedings had under Section 2932. A finding and determination by the legislative body that the limitation on assessments herein provided may be disregarded shall be final and conclusive upon all persons in the absence of actual fraud.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1949, Ch. 856.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 6. MAJORITY PROTEST [2930. - 2932.]

2930.

Notwithstanding anything in this division or in any law to which proceedings under this division are applicable, if at any time before the adoption of an ordinance or resolution of intention or within the time when protests may be filed under the provisions of any such law there is a written protest filed with the clerk of the legislative body by the owners (as defined in the act under which it is proposed to proceed) of a majority of the frontage of the property fronting on the acquisition or improvement in those cases where the cost in whole or part of the acquisition or improvement is to be assessed upon the property fronting on the acquisition or improvement, or by the owners of more than one-half of the area of the property to be assessed for the acquisition or improvement in those cases where the cost in whole or part of the acquisition or improvement is to be assessed upon the property within a district, and protests are not withdrawn so as to reduce the same to less than a majority, then the proposed proceedings shall be forthwith abandoned, and the legislative body shall not for one year from the filing of that written protest commence or carry on any proceedings for the same improvement or acquisition. Any such protest may be withdrawn by the owner making the same, in writing, at any time prior to the conclusion of the protest hearing held pursuant to the law under which it is proposed to proceed or any adjournment thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1949, Ch. 538.)
-------------------------------------------

2931.

If any majority protest is against only a portion of the improvement or acquisition then all further proceedings to construct that portion of the improvement or to acquire that portion of the acquisition so protested against shall be barred for a period of one year, but the legislative body shall not be barred from commencing new proceedings not including any part of the improvement or acquisition so protested against. Nothing in this act contained shall prohibit the legislative body, within said one-year period, from commencing and carrying on new proceedings for the construction of a portion of the improvement or the acquiring of a portion of the acquisition so protested against if it finds, by the affirmative vote of four-fifths of its members, that the owners of a majority of the property within the area of the assessment district to be established under said new proceedings are in favor of going forward with said portion of the improvement or acquisition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1703.)
-------------------------------------------

2932.

If the acquisition or improvement is for sewerage or drainage facilities only and is deemed by the legislative body conducting the proceedings to be necessary for the inhabitation or use of the property benefited, and such body shall, by a four-fifths vote of all members thereof entered upon its minutes, determine that said project is feasible and that the lands to be assessed will be able to carry the burden of such proposed assessment, it may by like vote overrule a majority protest in the proceedings hereunder or in the improvement proceedings to follow. Such finding and conclusion shall be final and conclusive in the absence of fraud.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 856.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 7. SUMMARY PROCEEDINGS [2950. - 2956.]

2950.

If the legislative body finds, after taking the steps provided by Sections 2821, 2822 and 2823, that the probable assessments will not exceed the limitations set up by this division, it may cause the clerk to mail prepaid postcards giving notice of its findings and proposed action. Each such notice shall have attached thereto an addressed reply postcard with the return postage thereon guaranteed.

The cards shall be mailed to each person to whom land in the proposed assessment district is assessed on the last equalized county assessment roll available on the date the report is commenced, at his address as shown upon such roll and to
 any person whether owner in fee or having a lien upon or legal or equitable interest in any land within the proposed district who has filed with the clerk his name and address and the designation of the land in which he is interested.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1945, Ch. 1008.)
-------------------------------------------

2951.

The notice of proposed assessment shall be substantially in the following form (filling in the blanks):
NOTICE OF PROPOSED ASSESSMENT

Notice is hereby given that the (name of the legislative body) proposes to adopt a resolution of intention under the (here mention statute under which it proposes to proceed) covering (here state in general terms what acquisitions and/or improvements are to be made). Your land will be assessed to pay a part of the cost thereof. This questionnaire is sent to the property owners interested to ascertain whether or not the owners of as much as 15 per
 cent of the area of the proposed district demand proceeding under the “Special Assessment Investigation, Limitation and Majority Protest Act of 1931.” Under said investigation act information will be obtained and a report thereon made, open to public inspection, and stating among other things (1) the estimated cost of the proposed project; (2) the estimated amount of existing assessments upon each parcel of land in the district; (3) the estimated assessment upon your lands for the proposed project. In the event that you desire the proceeding under said investigation act, so indicate on the attached card and return the same to the clerk within 30 days from (here set forth the date, not earlier than one day subsequent to the mailing of the cards). Sign your name legibly and describe or designate the property owned by you. Clerk
 of (here designate legislative body)The return post card as sent out shall be addressed to the clerk sending out the notice and shall have thereon a guarantee of the payment of the postage for the return thereof and on the reverse side shall contain the following:(does)The undersigned (does not) demand the making of the investigation provided for by the “Special Assessment, Investigation, Limitation and Majority Protest Act of 1931” in connection with the (here set forth the same description of the project as is contained upon the notice post card).(Signature)(Description ordesignation ofproperty)Instruction: If you are in favor of the improvement without the investigation report strike out the word “does.” If you desire the investigation
 report, whether or not you desire the improvement, strike out the words “does not.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1941, Ch. 1070.)
-------------------------------------------

2952.

If any parcel of land in the assessment district is assessed as owner unknown on the county assessment roll, no notice need be sent for such parcel unless the name and address of the person claiming an interest in that property is filed with the clerk, in which case notice shall be mailed to such person and address.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2953.

In the absence of fraud no error in the mailing of the notices, and no failure of any person to receive the notices shall in any way affect the validity of the proceedings, but the clerk shall file an affidavit of mailing such notices and shall include therein a list of the names and addresses of the person to whom such notices were sent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2954.

The return postcards shall be filed in the clerk’s office and after the expiration of the 30-day period specified in the Notice of Proposed Assessment all demands for the investigation made to the legislative body shall be computed and it shall by order entered on its minutes determine whether or not the owners of 15 per cent of the area of the proposed assessment district have demanded such investigation. Such determination shall be final and conclusive in the absence of actual fraud.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2955.

If the owners (as defined in the law under which it is proposed to proceed) of 15 per cent of the area of the proposed assessment district do not so demand the making of the investigation provided by this division, the legislative body shall be at full liberty to proceed under the statute under which it has declared its intention to carry through the contemplated proceedings without any further restrictions whatsoever by reason of the terms or provisions of this division except that the majority protest provisions of this division shall apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2956.

If the owners of 15 per cent or more of the area of the proposed district so demand the making of such investigation, all provisions of this division shall apply to the proposed proceeding, if any further steps are taken therein by the legislative body.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 7.5. ALTERNATIVE PROCEEDINGS [2960. - 2961.]

2960.

This part provides an alternative procedure for complying with the requirements of this division. This alternative procedure shall only be used by a legislative body undertaking assessment proceedings pursuant to the Municipal Improvement Act of 1913 (Division 12 (commencing with Section 10000)), whether or not in combination with another authorized assessment bond act. If a legislative body complies with the requirements of this part, all other requirements of this division are satisfied.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1298, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

2961.

If a legislative body determines to proceed under this part in forming an assessment district pursuant to the Municipal Improvement Act of 1913 (Division 12 (commencing with Section 10000)), it shall, in addition to complying with all requirements of that act, do all of the following:

(a) State in the resolution of intention that it adopts pursuant to Section 10200 that it intends to comply with the requirements of the Special Assessment Investigation, Limitation and Majority Protest Act of 1931 by proceeding under this part.

(b) Direct that all of the following information be included in the report prepared pursuant to Section 10204:

(1) The total amount, as near as may be determined, of the total principal sum of all unpaid special assessments and special assessments required or proposed to be levied under any completed or pending assessment proceedings, other than that contemplated in the instant proceedings, which would require an investigation and report under this division against the total area proposed to be assessed.

(2) The total true value, as near as may be determined, of the parcels of land and improvements which are proposed to be assessed. Total true value may be estimated as the full cash value of the parcels as shown upon the last equalized assessment roll of the county. Alternatively, total true value may be determined by other reasonable means, including, but not limited to, by adjusting the value shown on the last equalized assessment roll to correct for deviations from market value due to Article XIIIA of the California Constitution.

(c) Include in the notice sent pursuant to Section 10307 a statement of the total principal amount of unpaid assessments already levied against all the property proposed to be assessed, as computed in the project report.

(d) Before confirming the assessment pursuant to Section 10311, the legislative body shall find that the total amount of the principal sum of all unpaid special assessments levied against the parcels proposed to be assessed, as computed pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), plus the principal amount of the special assessment proposed to be levied in the instant proceedings, do not exceed one-half of the total value of the parcels proposed to be assessed, as computed pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b). The finding and determination of the legislative body shall be final and conclusive in the absence of fraud.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1298, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 8. DETERMINATION OF TRUE VALUE [2980. - 2980.]

2980.

(a) As used in this division, the “true value of parcels” and the “true value of each parcel” means the fair market value of the land and improvements thereon, as determined by the legislative body. The determination of the legislative body shall be final and conclusive in the absence of fraud.

(b) The legislative body may determine that the fair market value of the land and improvements is their full cash value as defined by Article XIIIA of the California Constitution and as shown upon the last equalized assessment roll of the county. However, this subdivision does not prevent the legislative body from determining fair market value by other reasonable means.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1298, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 9. COSTS OF PROCEEDINGS [2995. - 2996.]

2995.

If the improvement or acquisition is made, all or any part of the cost of the proceedings taken under this division may be included in the incidental expenses of such acquisition or improvement as a part of the amount for which special assessments may be levied or bonds payable by special assessments issued under the law under which the acquisition or improvement is made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

2996.

In the event that any proceedings are abandoned by reason of protest filed pursuant to the provisions of Section 2930 hereof, or for any other reason, the cost and expense of such proceedings to the date of such abandonment shall be a charge against the treasurer of the city, county, district or other public corporation instituting such proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 1070.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 10. OBJECTIONS AND LIMITATIONS [3010. - 3012.]

3010.

All objections to the form, contents, validity or sufficiency of the report on the project and all objections to the form, contents, validity or sufficiency of the notice of hearing on the report shall be made in writing and filed with the clerk of the legislative body at or before the time fixed for the hearing on the report, and if not so made at such time shall be waived and no objection thereto may be made thereafter except in case of actual fraud. Any such objections shall be heard and considered and at such hearing the report may be amended in accordance with the facts, and the hearing had upon such report as so amended.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

3011.

All objections or protests relating to the validity of the proceedings had under this division, and not otherwise provided for in this division, shall be made in writing and filed in the manner and not later than the time at which protests or objections may be filed for the hearing designated in the resolution or ordinance of intention, and any protest or objection relating to the validity of the proceedings had under this division not made at such time and in such manner shall be waived and may not thereafter be urged, pleaded or raised in any action or proceeding, and the adoption of a resolution or ordinance finally ordering the acquisition or improvement shall be conclusive evidence that the proceedings prior thereto under this division are valid and sufficient.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

3012.

Any action, suit, or proceeding of any kind or nature in which the validity of any of the proceedings taken under this division is questioned or attacked, and any defense in the action, suit, or proceeding, shall be filed within 30 days after the date of the adoption of the resolution or ordinance finally acting on the investigation report or after the date of final action taken pursuant to Section 2804 or 2808 or Part 7 (commencing with Section 2950). If the action is not brought or a defense is not filed within those 30 days, then thereafter all persons shall be barred in any action, suit, or proceeding from pleading, asserting, or claiming that any of the proceedings up to and including the action on the investigation report, or other action specified in this section, were defective, faulty, or invalid in any respect.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 106, Sec. 154.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================
